Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB760.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 171.396 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this section and KRS 171.3961 and 171.397 and Section 3 of this Act:
(1) "Certified historic structure" means a structure that is located within the
Commonwealth of Kentucky that is:
(a) Listed individually on the National Register of Historic Places; or
(b) Located in a historic district listed on the National Register of Historic Places
and is certified by the council as contributing to the historic significance of
the district;
(2) "Certified rehabilitation" means a completed substantial rehabilitation of a certified
historic structure that the council certifies meets the United States Secretary of the
Interior's Standards for Rehabilitation;
(3) "Certified rehabilitation credit cap" means an annual amount of [:
(a) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for applications received prior to April 30,
2010;
(b) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for applications received on or after April
30, 2010, but before April 30, 2022; and
(c) ]one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for applications received on or after:
(a) April 30, 2022, but before April 30, 2026, allocated with:
1. Twenty-five percent (25%) of the credit cap awarded to owner-occupied
residential property; and
2. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the credit cap awarded to property other
than owner-occupied residential property, which includes the major
certified rehabilitation allowed under KRS 171.3963; and
(b) April 30, 2026, in accordance with Section 3 of this Act, allocated with:
1. Fifteen percent (15%) of the credit cap awarded to owner-occupied
Page 1 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
residential property; and
2. Eighty-five percent (85%) of the credit cap awarded to property other
than owner-occupied residential property; including workforce
housing property;
plus any amounts[amount] added to the certified rehabilitation credit cap pursuant
to KRS 171.397(2)(c) and Section 3 of this Act;
(4) "Council" means the Kentucky Heritage Council;
(5) "Disqualifying work" means work that is performed within three (3) years of the
completion of the certified rehabilitation that, if performed as part of the
rehabilitation certified under KRS 171.397 and Section 3 of this Act, would have
made the rehabilitation ineligible for certification;
(6) "Exempt entity" means any tax exempt organization pursuant to sec. 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code, any political subdivision of the Commonwealth, any
state or local agency, board, or commission, or any quasi-governmental entity;
(7) "Local government" means a city, county, urban-county, charter county, or
consolidated local government;
(8) "Owner-occupied residential property" means a building or portion thereof,
condominium, or cooperative occupied by the owner as his or her principal
residence;
(9) "Qualified rehabilitation expense" means any amount that is properly chargeable to
a capital account, whether or not depreciation is allowed under Section 168 of the
Internal Revenue Code, and is expended at any time in connection with the certified
rehabilitation of a certified historic structure. It shall include the cost of restoring
landscaping and fencing that contributes to the historic significance of this
structure, but shall not include the cost of acquisition of a certified historic
structure, enlargement of or additions to an existing building, or the purchase of
personal property;
Page 2 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
(10) "Substantial rehabilitation" means rehabilitation of a certified historic structure for
which the qualified rehabilitation expenses, during a twenty-four (24) month period
selected by the taxpayer or exempt entity, ending with or within the taxable year,
exceed:
(a) Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for an owner-occupied residential
property; or
(b) For all other property, the greater of:
1. The adjusted basis of the structure; or
2. Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000);
(11) "Taxpayer" means any individual, corporation, limited liability company, business
development corporation, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship,
association, joint stock company, receivership, trust, professional service
organization, or other legal entity through which business is conducted that:
(a) Elects to claim the credit on a return and receive a refund as provided in KRS
171.397(2)(b)2.a. or Section 3 of this Act; or
(b) Is the recipient of a credit which is transferred as provided in KRS
171.397(2)(b)2.b. or Section 3 of this Act;[ and]
(12) "Qualified purchased historic home" means any substantially rehabilitated certified
historic structure if:
(a) The taxpayer claiming the credit authorized under KRS 171.397 or Section 3
of this Act is the first purchaser of the structure after the date of completion of
the substantial rehabilitation;
(b) The structure or a portion thereof will be the principal residence of the
taxpayer; and
(c) No credit was allowed to the seller under this section.
A qualified purchased historic home shall be deemed owner-occupied residential
property for purposes of this section; and
Page 3 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
(13) "Workforce housing" means a certified historic structure that for a minimum
period of five (5) years after the building is placed in service, has at least fifty
percent (50%) of the structure's square footage designated to residential space
that is:
(a) Available for lease, rent, or sale; and
(b) Affordable to individuals earning eighty percent (80%) of the county-level
area median income or less as determined by the United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development.
Section 2. KRS 171.397 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) For all applications for a preliminary approval received prior to April 30,
2010, there shall be allowed as a credit against the taxes imposed by KRS
141.020, 141.040, 141.0401, or 136.505, an amount equal to:
1. Thirty percent (30%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenses, in the case
of owner-occupied residential property; and
2. Twenty percent (20%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenses, in the
case of all other property.
In the case of an exempt entity that has incurred qualified rehabilitation
expenses, the credit provided in this subsection shall be available to transfer
or assign as provided under subsection (8) or (9) of this section.
(b) For applications for preliminary approval received on or after April 30, 2010,
the credit shall be refundable if the taxpayer makes an election under
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(2) (a) A taxpayer seeking the credit provided under subsection (1) of this section
shall file an application for a preliminary determination of maximum credit
eligibility before April 30 of the year in which the proposed project will
begin. The application shall describe the project and shall include
documentation supporting the qualification of the project for the credit, the
Page 4 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
proposed start date, the proposed completion date, the projected qualified
rehabilitation expenses, and any other information the council may require.
The council shall determine the preliminary maximum credit available for
each taxpayer and shall notify the taxpayer of that amount by June 30 of the
year in which the application was filed. If total credits applied for in any year
exceed the certified rehabilitation credit cap, plus any amounts added to the
cap pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection, the provisions of subsection
(5) of this section shall be applied to reduce the approved credits for all
taxpayers with qualifying applications for that year.
(b) 1. An application for a final determination of credit shall be submitted to
the council upon completion of the project.
2. The application shall include an irrevocable election by the taxpayer to:
a. Use the credit, in which case, the credit shall be refundable; or
b. Transfer the credit.
3. The council shall determine the final amount of credit approved for each
taxpayer based upon the actual expenditures, preliminary determination
of maximum credit, and a determination that the expenditures are
qualified rehabilitation expenses.
4. The council shall notify the taxpayer and Department of Revenue of the
final approved credit amount within sixty (60) days of the receipt of a
completed application from the taxpayer.
(c) 1. If the total amount of credits finally approved for a taxpayer under
paragraph (b) of this subsection are less than the credits initially
approved for a taxpayer under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
difference between the two (2) amounts shall be added to the certified
rehabilitation credit cap for the next calendar year.
2. If the total amount of credits approved under paragraph (a) of this
Page 5 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
subsection in any calendar year is less than the certified rehabilitation
credit cap, the difference between the credits actually awarded and the
certified rehabilitation credit cap shall be added to the certified
rehabilitation credit cap for the next calendar year.
(3) (a) The maximum credit which may be claimed with regard to owner-occupied
residential property shall be one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000)
subject to subsection (5) of this section. The credit in this section shall be
claimed for the taxable year in which the certified rehabilitation is completed.
(b) The maximum credit which may be claimed with regard to all other property
that is not owner-occupied residential shall be ten million dollars
($10,000,000) subject to subsection (5) of this section. The credit in this
section shall be claimed for the taxable year in which the certified
rehabilitation is completed.
(4) In the case of a husband and wife filing separate returns or filing separately on a
joint return, the credit may be taken by either or divided equally, but the combined
credit shall not exceed one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) if subject to
the limitation in subsection (3)(a) of this section, or ten million dollars
($10,000,000) if subject to the limitation in subsection (3)(b) of this section, subject
to the provisions of subsection (5) of this section.
(5) The credit amount approved for a calendar year for all taxpayers under subsection
(2)(a) of this section shall be limited to the certified rehabilitation credit cap. When
the total credits applied for and approved in any year under subsection (2)(a) of this
section exceed the certified rehabilitation credit cap, the council shall apportion the
certified rehabilitation credit cap as follows: The certified rehabilitation credit cap
for the year under consideration shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator
which is the approved credit amount for an individual taxpayer for a calendar year
and the denominator which is the total approved credits for all taxpayers for a
Page 6 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
calendar year.
(6) (a) For all applications received prior to April 30, 2010, if the credit amount that
may be claimed in any tax year as determined under subsections (3) to (5) of
this section exceeds the taxpayer's total tax liabilities under KRS 136.505,
141.020, or 141.040 and 141.0401, the taxpayer may carry the excess tax
credit forward until the tax credit is used, provided that any tax credits not
used within seven (7) years of the taxable year the certified rehabilitation was
complete shall be lost.
(b) For all applications received on or after April 30, 2010, if the credit amount
that may be claimed in any tax year as determined under subsections (3) to (5)
of this section exceeds the taxpayer's total tax liabilities under KRS 136.505,
141.020, or 141.040 and 141.0401, the taxpayer may receive a refund, if the
taxpayer elected to take the credit as required by subsection (2)(b) of this
section.
(7) (a) The credit shall apply against both the tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or
141.040 and the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401, with
the ordering of credits as provided in KRS 141.0205.
(b) 1. For applications received prior to April 30, 2010, if the taxpayer is a
pass-through entity not subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.040, the
taxpayer shall apply the credit at the entity level against the limited
liability tax entity imposed by KRS 141.0401, and shall also pass the
credit through in the same proportion as the distributive share of income
or loss is passed through.
2. For applications received on or after April 30, 2010, if the taxpayer is a
pass-through entity not subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.040, the
taxpayer shall apply the credit at the entity level against the limited
liability tax entity imposed by KRS 141.0401, and may receive a refund
Page 7 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
if the taxpayer elected to take the credit as required by subsection
(2)(b)2.a. of this section.
(8) Credits received under this section may be transferred or assigned if an election is
made under subsection (2)(b) of this section, for some or no consideration, along
with any related benefits, rights, responsibilities, and liabilities to a financial
institution as defined in KRS 141.010 subject to the taxes imposed by KRS
136.505, 141.040, or 141.0401. Within thirty (30) days of the date of any transfer of
credits, the party transferring the credits shall notify the Department of Revenue of:
(a) The name, address, employer identification number, and bank routing and
transfer number, of the party to which the credits are transferred;
(b) The amount of credits transferred; and
(c) Any additional information the Department of Revenue deems necessary.
The provisions of this subsection shall apply to any credits that pass through to a
successor or beneficiary of a taxpayer.
(9) For purposes of this section, a lessee of a certified historic structure shall be treated
as the owner of the structure if the remaining term of the lease is not less than the
minimum period promulgated by administrative regulation by the council.
(10) The taxes imposed in KRS 141.020, 141.040, and 141.0401 shall not apply to any
consideration received for the transfer, sale, assignment, or use of a tax credit
approved under this section.
(11) The Department of Revenue shall assess a penalty on any taxpayer or exempt entity
that performs disqualifying work, as determined by the Kentucky Heritage Council,
on a certified historic structure for which a rehabilitation has been certified under
this section in an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the tax credit
allowed on the rehabilitation. Any penalties shall be assessed against the property
owner who performs the disqualifying work and not against any transferee of the
credits.
Page 8 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
(12) The council may impose fees for processing applications for tax credits, not to
exceed the actual cost associated with processing the applications.
(13) The council may authorize a local government to perform an initial review of
applications for the credit allowed under this section and forward the applications to
the council with its recommendations.
(14) The council and the Department of Revenue may promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A to establish
policies and procedures to implement the provisions of subsections (1) to (13) of
this section.
(15) The tax credit authorized by this section shall apply to tax periods ending on or
after December 31, 2005.
(16) This section applies to applications received before April 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 171 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) There is available a certified rehabilitation credit for taxpayers who incur
qualified rehabilitation expenses for the certified rehabilitation of a certified
historic structure.
(b) This section applies to applications received on or after April 30, 2026.
(2) (a) Credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed by:
1. KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and 141.0401; or
2. KRS 136.320, 136.330, 136.340, 136.350, 136.360, 136.370, 136.390,
or 136.392 if the entity is not subject to the taxes imposed by KRS
141.020 or 141.040 and 141.0401.
(b) The amount of credit shall be equal to:
1. Thirty percent (30%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenses, in the
case of owner-occupied residential property;
2. Thirty percent (30%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenses, in the
Page 9 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
case of workforce housing property; or
3. Twenty percent (20%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenses, in the
case of all other property.
(3) (a) There shall be two (2) rounds of applications per calendar year for the
credit provided under subsection (2) of this section, and a taxpayer seeking
the credit shall file an application for a preliminary determination of
maximum credit eligibility before:
1. April 15 of the year in which the proposed project will begin; or
2. August 15 of the year in which the proposed project will begin.
(b) The certified rehabilitation credit cap shall be allocated as follows,
including any amounts added to the certified rehabilitation credit cap
pursuant to paragraph (h) of this subsection:
1. Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) for applications received in
accordance with paragraph (a)1. of this subsection; and
2. Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) for applications received in
accordance with paragraph (a)2. of this subsection.
(c) In the event the full allocation in paragraph (b)1. is not utilized for
applications received by April 15, the remainder shall be made available for
applications received in accordance with paragraph (a)2. of this subsection.
(d) If the total amount of preliminary approvals for all applications received in
a single application round under paragraph (a)1. or 2. of this subsection
exceeds the cap of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) plus any amounts
added to the credit cap, the council shall apportion the certified
rehabilitation credit cap as follows:
1. The certified rehabilitation credit cap for the application round under
consideration shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator which is
the approved credit amount for an individual taxpayer for an
Page 10 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
application round and the denominator which is the total approved
credits for all taxpayers for an application round; and
2. Each taxpayer shall receive not more than their pro rata share of the
certified rehabilitation credit cap allocated for the corresponding
application round.
(e) Applications submitted for preliminary approval shall be reviewed in the
order in which they are received based on the date of the application.
(f) The council shall determine the preliminary maximum credit available for
each taxpayer and shall notify the taxpayer of that amount by:
1. June 30 for applications received on or before April 15 of the same
calendar year in which the application was filed; or
2. October 30 for applications received on or before August 15 of the
same calendar year in which the application was filed.
(g) An application submitted for preliminary approval shall describe the project
and shall include documentation supporting the qualification of the project
for the credit, the proposed start date, the proposed completion date, the
projected qualified rehabilitation expenses, and any other information the
council may require.
(h) 1. If the total amount of credits finally approved for a taxpayer under
paragraph (i) of this subsection is less than the amount of the credits
initially approved for a taxpayer under paragraph (f) of this
subsection, the difference between the two (2) amounts shall be added
to the certified rehabilitation credit cap for the next calendar year.
2. If the total amount of credits approved under paragraph (f) of this
subsection in any calendar year is less than the certified rehabilitation
credit cap, the difference between the credits actually awarded and the
certified rehabilitation credit cap shall be added to the certified
Page 11 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
rehabilitation credit cap for the next calendar year.
3. If the entire credit cap allocated for applications in paragraph (b) of
this subsection is not entirely utilized for preliminary applications
received under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the remaining portion
shall be made available for all other properties having submitted
preliminary applications within the same application round regardless
of property type.
(i) 1. An application for a final determination of credit shall be submitted to
the council upon completion of the project. A taxpayer who is no
longer the owner of the certified historic structure may apply for final
determination of credit as long as the taxpayer received preliminary
approval under paragraph (f) of this subsection and substantially
rehabilitated the certified historic structure.
2. The application shall include an irrevocable election by the taxpayer
to:
a. Use the credit, in which case the credit shall be refundable; or
b. Transfer the credit in accordance with subsection (7) of this
section, in which case the credit shall be nonrefundable.
3. The council shall determine the final amount of credit approved for
each taxpayer based upon the actual expenditures, preliminary
determination of maximum credit, and a determination that the
expenditures are qualified rehabilitation expenses. All qualified
rehabilitation expenses shall be included in the final calculation of the
credit.
4. The council shall notify the taxpayer and Department of Revenue of
the final approved credit amount within sixty (60) days of the receipt
of a completed application from the taxpayer.
Page 12 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
5. If an election is made in accordance with subsection (6) of this
section, the council shall provide a copy of the written authorization
and amount of approved credit allocated by the pass-through entity.
(4) Subject to the certified rehabilitation cap in subsection (3)(b) of this section any
appointment required under subsection (3)(d) of this section:
(a) The maximum credit which may be claimed with regard to owner-occupied
residential property shall be one hundred twenty thousand dollars
($120,000), and the credit in this section shall be claimed for the taxable
year in which the certified rehabilitation is completed; and
(b) The maximum credit which may be claimed with regard to all other
property that is not owner-occupied residential shall be ten million dollars
($10,000,000), and the credit in this section shall be claimed for the taxable
year in which the certified rehabilitation is completed.
(5) In the case of two (2) spouses filing separate returns or filing separately on a
joint return, the credit may be taken by either or divided equally, but the
combined credit shall not exceed one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000)
if subject to the limitation in subsection (4)(a) of this section, or ten million
dollars ($10,000,000) if subject to the limitation in subsection (4)(b) of this
section.
(6) (a) If the taxpayer is a pass-through entity not subject to the tax imposed by
KRS 141.040, the taxpayer shall:
1. Apply the credit at the entity level against the limited liability entity tax
imposed by KRS 141.0401; or
2. At the election and written authorization of the approved entity, pass
the credit through to their partners, members, or shareholders in any
manner so prescribed by the approved entity and may be
disproportionate to such partner's, member's, or shareholder's
Page 13 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
distributive share of net income or loss.
(b) This subsection shall apply to any credits that pass through to a partner or
successor or beneficiary of a taxpayer.
(7) (a) Credits received under this section may be transferred or assigned if an
election is made under subsection (3)(i)2. of this section, for some or no
consideration, along with any related benefits, rights, responsibilities, and
liabilities to any person or entity subject to the taxes imposed by:
1. KRS 141.020, 141.040, or 141.040; or
2. KRS 136.320, 136.330, 136.340, 136.350, 136.360, 136.370, 136.390,
or 136.392.
(b) Within thirty (30) days of the date of any transfer of credits, the party
transferring the credits shall notify the Department of Revenue and provide:
1. The name, address, employer identification number, and bank routing
and transfer numbers of the party to which the credits are transferred;
2. The amount of credit transferred; and
3. Any additional information the Department of Revenue deems
necessary.
(c) Any taxpayer receiving transferred credit under this subsection may carry
forward unused credit for a period not to exceed seven (7) taxable years
from which the certified rehabilitation was complete.
(d) This subsection shall apply to any credits that pass through to a partner or
successor or beneficiary of a taxpayer.
(8) For purposes of this section, a lessee of a certified historic structure shall be
treated as the owner of the structure if the remaining term of the lease is not less
than the minimum period established in an administrative regulation
promulgated by the council.
(9) The taxes imposed in KRS 141.020, 141.040, and 141.0401 shall not apply to any
Page 14 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
consideration received for the transfer, sale, assignment, or use of a tax credit
approved under this section.
(10) (a) The Department of Revenue shall assess a penalty in an amount equal to
one hundred percent (100%) of the tax credit allowed on the rehabilitation
on any taxpayer or exempt entity that:
1. Performs disqualifying work as determined by the Kentucky Heritage
Council; or
2. Fails to maintain compliance with the workforce housing
requirements established in subsection (13) of Section 1 of this Act, as
determined by the council and the Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(b) Any penalties assessed under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be
assessed against the property owner and not against any transferee of the
credits.
(11) The council may impose fees for processing applications for tax credits, not to
exceed the actual cost associated with processing the applications.
(12) The council may authorize a local government to perform an initial review of
applications for the credit allowed under this section and forward the applications
to the council with its recommendations.
(13) The council and the Department of Revenue may promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish policies and
procedures necessary to implement this section.
Section 4. KRS 141.0205 is amended to read as follows:
If a taxpayer is entitled to more than one (1) of the tax credits allowed against the tax
imposed by KRS 141.020, 141.040, and 141.0401, the priority of application and use of
the credits shall be determined as follows:
(1) The nonrefundable business incentive credits against the tax imposed by KRS
141.020 shall be taken in the following order:
Page 15 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
(a) The limited liability entity tax credit permitted by KRS 141.0401;
(b) The economic development credits computed under KRS 141.347, 141.381,
141.384, 141.3841, 141.400, 141.403, 141.407, 141.415, 154.12-207, and
154.12-2088;
(c) The qualified farming operation credit permitted by KRS 141.412;
(d) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.397(1)(a);
(e) The health insurance credit permitted by KRS 141.062;
(f) The tax paid to other states credit permitted by KRS 141.070;
(g) The credit for hiring the unemployed permitted by KRS 141.065;
(h) The recycling or composting equipment credit permitted by KRS 141.390;
(i) The [tax ]credit for cash contributions in investment funds permitted by KRS
154.20-263 in effect prior to July 15, 2002, and the credit permitted by KRS
154.20-258;
(j) The research facilities credit permitted by KRS 141.395;
(k) The employer High School Equivalency Diploma program incentive credit
permitted under KRS 151B.402;
(l) The voluntary environmental remediation credit permitted by KRS 141.418;
(m) The biodiesel and renewable diesel credit permitted by KRS 141.423;
(n) The clean coal incentive credit permitted by KRS 141.428;
(o) The ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4242;
(p) The cellulosic ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4244;
(q) The energy efficiency credits permitted by KRS 141.436;
(r) The railroad maintenance and improvement credit permitted by KRS 141.385;
(s) The Endow Kentucky credit permitted by KRS 141.438;
(t) The New Markets Development Program credit permitted by KRS 141.434;
(u) The distilled spirits credit permitted by KRS 141.389;
(v) The angel investor credit permitted by KRS 141.396;
Page 16 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
(w) The film industry credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications approved
on or after April 27, 2018, but before January 1, 2022;
(x) The inventory credit permitted by KRS 141.408;
(y) The renewable chemical production credit permitted by KRS 141.4231; and
(z) The qualified broadband investment [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.391;
(2) After the application of the nonrefundable credits in subsection (1) of this section,
the nonrefundable personal tax credits against the tax imposed by KRS 141.020
shall be taken in the following order:
(a) The individual credits permitted by KRS 141.020(3);
(b) The credit permitted by KRS 141.066;
(c) The tuition credit permitted by KRS 141.069;
(d) The household and dependent care credit permitted by KRS 141.067;
(e) The income gap credit permitted by KRS 141.066; and
(f) The Education Opportunity Account Program [tax ]credit permitted by KRS
141.522;
(3) After the application of the nonrefundable credits provided for in subsection (2) of
this section, the refundable credits against the tax imposed by KRS 141.020 shall be
taken in the following order:
(a) The individual withholding tax credit permitted by KRS 141.350;
(b) The individual estimated tax payment credit permitted by KRS 141.305;
(c) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.3961, 171.3963, and
171.397(1)(b) and Section 3 of this Act;
(d) The film industry [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications
approved prior to April 27, 2018, or on or after January 1, 2022;
(e) The development area [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.398;
(f) The decontamination [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.419; and
(g) The pass-through entity tax credit permitted by KRS 141.209;
Page 17 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
(4) The nonrefundable credit permitted by KRS 141.0401 shall be applied against the
tax imposed by KRS 141.040;
(5) The following nonrefundable credits shall be applied against the sum of the tax
imposed by KRS 141.040 after subtracting the credit provided for in subsection (4)
of this section, and the tax imposed by KRS 141.0401 in the following order:
(a) The economic development credits computed under KRS 141.347, 141.381,
141.384, 141.3841, 141.400, 141.403, 141.407, 141.415, 154.12-207, and
154.12-2088;
(b) The qualified farming operation credit permitted by KRS 141.412;
(c) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.397(1)(a);
(d) The health insurance credit permitted by KRS 141.062;
(e) The unemployment credit permitted by KRS 141.065;
(f) The recycling or composting equipment credit permitted by KRS 141.390;
(g) The coal conversion credit permitted by KRS 141.041;
(h) The enterprise zone credit permitted by KRS 154.45-090, for taxable periods
ending prior to January 1, 2008;
(i) The [tax ]credit for cash contributions to investment funds permitted by KRS
154.20-263 in effect prior to July 15, 2002, and the credit permitted by KRS
154.20-258;
(j) The research facilities credit permitted by KRS 141.395;
(k) The employer High School Equivalency Diploma program incentive credit
permitted by KRS 151B.402;
(l) The voluntary environmental remediation credit permitted by KRS 141.418;
(m) The biodiesel and renewable diesel credit permitted by KRS 141.423;
(n) The clean coal incentive credit permitted by KRS 141.428;
(o) The ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4242;
(p) The cellulosic ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4244;
Page 18 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
(q) The energy efficiency credits permitted by KRS 141.436;
(r) The ENERGY STAR home or ENERGY STAR manufactured home credit
permitted by KRS 141.437;
(s) The railroad maintenance and improvement credit permitted by KRS 141.385;
(t) The railroad expansion credit permitted by KRS 141.386;
(u) The Endow Kentucky credit permitted by KRS 141.438;
(v) The New Markets Development Program credit permitted by KRS 141.434;
(w) The distilled spirits credit permitted by KRS 141.389;
(x) The film industry credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications approved
on or after April 27, 2018, but before January 1, 2022;
(y) The inventory credit permitted by KRS 141.408;
(z) The renewable chemical production [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.4231;
(aa) The Education Opportunity Account Program tax credit permitted by KRS
141.522; and
(ab) The qualified broadband investment [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.391;
and
(6) After the application of the nonrefundable credits in subsection (5) of this section,
the refundable credits shall be taken in the following order:
(a) The corporation estimated tax payment credit permitted by KRS 141.044;
(b) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.3961, 171.3963, and
171.397(1)(b) and Section 3 of this Act;
(c) The film industry [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications
approved prior to April 27, 2018, or on or after January 1, 2022;
(d) The decontamination [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.419; and
(e) The pass-through entity tax credit permitted by KRS 141.209.
Section 5. KRS 141.382 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
Page 19 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
(a) "Certified historic structure" means the same as defined in KRS 171.396;
(b) "Qualified rehabilitation expense" means the same as defined in KRS
171.396; and
(c) "Substantial rehabilitation" means the same as defined in KRS 171.396.
(2) A refundable or transferable credit in the amount determined in KRS 171.397 and
Section 3 of this Act shall be allowed against the taxes imposed by KRS Chapter
136[.505] or KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and 141.0401, with the ordering of credits
provided in KRS 141.0205, for qualified rehabilitation expenses incurred by the
taxpayer and used for substantial rehabilitation to a certified historic structure.
Section 6. KRS 171.3961 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, a taxpayer completing a
certified rehabilitation to a certified historic structure shall be allowed a credit
against the taxes imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and 141.0401, with the
ordering of credits as provided in KRS 141.0205, or KRS 136.505 if:
(a) The certified historic structure is located within the jurisdiction of a
consolidated local government or urban-county government;
(b) The amount of qualified rehabilitation expenses exceeds fifteen million
dollars ($15,000,000);
(c) The certified historic structure is located within one-half (1/2) mile of a tax
increment financing development area which has received at least preliminary
approval under KRS 65.490 or 154.30-050; and
(d) Substantial rehabilitation of the certified historic structure begins prior to July
1, 2015.
(2) (a) The credit shall:
1. Equal the percentage of qualified rehabilitation expenses as provided in
KRS 171.397(1)(a) and Section 3 of this Act;
2. Only apply to the first thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) of qualified
Page 20 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
rehabilitation expenses; and
3. Be refundable and transferable.
(b) Any projects approved for a credit under this section shall not be subject to
any caps established by KRS 171.397 or Section 3 of this Act and shall not be
considered in determining whether the certified rehabilitation credit cap has
been met in any year.
(3) The taxpayer seeking the credit shall file the applications for preliminary
determination and final determination as provided by KRS 171.397(2) and Section
3 of this Act.
(4) The total approved credit shall be available over a four (4) year period and the
maximum credit which may be claimed in a taxable year shall not exceed twenty-
five percent (25%) of the total approved credit.
(5) The provisions of KRS 171.397(9) to (14) and subsections (8) to (13) of Section 3
of this Act shall also apply to this section.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The corporation shall work with the Kentucky Heritage Council to administer the
certified rehabilitation credit permitted by Section 3 of this Act.
(2) For workforce housing properties that are granted credit based on thirty percent
(30%) of qualified rehabilitation expenses for providing housing that is
affordable to households earning eighty percent (80%) or less of the Area Median
Income, the corporation shall ensure that the workforce housing property remain
compliant with this requirement for a minimum of five (5) years within the
completion of the certified rehabilitation.
(3) The corporation, in conjunction with the Kentucky Heritage Council and the
Department of Revenue, may promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish policies and procedures to ensure
Page 21 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 395
compliance with this section.
Section 8. Whereas approving applicants for the certified rehabilitation credit in
a timely manner is important to the rehabilitation of historic structures in the
Commonwealth and the administration of the credit, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Page 22 of 22
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:34 PM Jacketed